Washington statutes.
RCW 19.27.074

State building code council—Duties—Public meetings—Timing of code changes.

(1) The state building code council shall:

(a) Adopt and maintain the codes to which reference is made in RCW 19.27.031 in a status which is consistent with the state's interest as set forth in RCW 19.27.020. In maintaining these codes, the council shall regularly review updated versions of the codes referred to in RCW 19.27.031 and other pertinent information and shall amend the codes pursuant to RCW 19.27.031 through 19.27.034 as deemed appropriate by the council, provided, that Wildland Urban Interface Codes must be consistent with RCW 19.27.560;

(b) Approve or deny all county or city amendments to any code referred to in RCW 19.27.031 to the degree the amendments apply to single-family or multifamily residential buildings;

(c) As required by the legislature, develop and adopt any codes relating to buildings; and

(d) Approve a proposed budget for the operation of the state building code council to be submitted by the department of enterprise services to the office of financial management pursuant to RCW 43.88.090.

(2) The state building code council may:

(a) Appoint technical advisory groups in accordance with RCW 19.27.033;

(b) Approve contracts for services; and

(c) Conduct research into matters relating to any code or codes referred to in RCW 19.27.031 or any related matter.

(3) The department of enterprise services, with the advice and input from the members of the building code council, shall:

(a) Employ a managing director of the council, and permanent and temporary staff to perform all duties necessary to carry out the intent and purposes of this chapter and chapter 19.27A RCW;

(b) Contract with an independent, third-party entity to perform comparative economic and energy analyses of proposed Washington energy code amendments and prior versions of the Washington energy code, including compliance with RCW 34.05.328 and 19.27A.160; and

(c) Provide all administrative and information technology services required for the building code council.

(4) Rule-making authority as authorized in this chapter resides within the building code council.

(5)(a) All meetings of the state building code council, its standing committees, ad hoc committees, and technical advisory groups shall be open to the public under the open public meetings act, chapter 42.30 RCW. All actions of the state building code council which adopt or amend any code of statewide applicability shall be pursuant to the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

(b) All council decisions relating to the codes enumerated in RCW 19.27.031 shall require approval by at least a majority of the voting members of the council.

(c) All decisions to adopt or amend codes of statewide application through a three-year code adoption cycle shall be made prior to December 1st of any year and shall not take effect before the end of the regular legislative session in the next year.

[ 2024 c 170 s 3; 2024 c 133 s 2; 2018 c 207 s 4; 1989 c 266 s 3; 1985 c 360 s 2.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 2024 c 133 s 2 and by 2024 c 170 s 3, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Effective date—2024 c 133: See note following RCW 19.27.031.

Effective date—2018 c 207 ss 1-8: See note following RCW 19.27.070.